test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s3x30_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - æra: # 
    skreiða+V+Inf: skreiða
    skreiða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [skreiðir, skreiðar]
    skreiða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [skreiddi, skreiðaði]
    skreiða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [skreiddu, skreiðaðu]
    skreiða+V+Sup: [skreitt, skreiðað]
    skreiða+V+PrfPrc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [skreiddur, skreiðaður]
